Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1084
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any body politic or corporate, society, community, the public generally, any individual, partnership, limited liability company, joint-stock company, or association, or any agent of any such entity.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 62.